Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1812
Hearing officer or committee; order; determine and allow attorney's fees.

The hearing officer or the committee may, as part of an order entered under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, determine and allow reasonable attorney's fees not to exceed five percent of any compensation awarded. If the decision of a hearing officer or the committee is appealed, the court shall determine reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 12;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 13.